District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-321.01

Corporation treated as tax-exempt private foundation; provisions deemed contained in governing instrument; amendment of governing instrument.

Repealed.

Dec. 6, 1971, 85 Stat. 496, Pub. L. 92-177, § 2
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(m), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-321.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-531.
1973 Ed., § 29-1030a.

Prior Codifications